Alabama, session 2026rs, HB395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 28-3-53.2, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
Page 1

amended to read as follows:
HB395 INTRODUCED
"§28-3-53.2
(a) The word board, wherever used in this section,
shall mean the Alabama Alcoholic Beverage Control Board
provided for in Chapter 3, Title 28. The term mark up,
wherever used in this section shall mean For purposes of this
section, the term "mark up" means the percentage amount added
to cost of merchandise plus freight on spirituous or vinous
liquors liquor sold by the board, exclusive of taxes
heretofore levied under this article with respect thereto to
liquor, and the term "cost of merchandise" only includes the
amount the board pays for case lots of liquor.
(b) The total amount of the additional mark up on cost
of merchandise, levied by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board
board subsequent to June 30, 1983, shall be designated to the
credit of the State General Fund of the state.
(c) The board shall be prohibited from increasing the
mark up on wholesale case lot sales of liquor above 16.99
percent of the cost of merchandise plus freight subsequent to
December 1, 2004."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2